Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITY OF BLOOMINGTON; ON-SALE BEER AND WINE LICENSE.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any other law or ordinance to the contrary, the city of Bloomington may issue an on-sale malt liquor license and an on-sale wine license for the Dwan Golf Course, which is located in and owned by the city. The provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 340A, not inconsistent with this section, apply to the license issued under this section. The city of Bloomington is deemed the licensee under this section, and the provisions of Minnesota Statutes, sections 340A.603 and 340A.604, apply to the license as if the establishment were a municipal liquor store. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the city of Bloomington and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end